Utah statutes.
76-7-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  "Abortion" means:
(i)  the intentional termination or attempted termination of human pregnancy
after implantation of a fertilized ovum through a medical procedure carried
out by a physician or through a substance used under the direction of a
physician;
(ii)  the intentional killing or attempted killing of a live unborn child
through a medical procedure carried out by a physician or through a substance
used under the direction of a physician; or
(iii)  the intentional causing or attempted causing of a miscarriage through a
medical procedure carried out by a physician or through a substance used under
the direction of a physician.
(b)  "Abortion" does not include:
(i)  removal of a dead unborn child;
(ii)  removal of an ectopic pregnancy; or
(iii)  the killing or attempted killing of an unborn child without the consent
of the pregnant woman, unless:
(A)  the killing or attempted killing is done through a medical procedure
carried out by a physician or through a substance used under the direction of
a physician; and
(B)  the physician is unable to obtain the consent due to a medical emergency.
(2)  "Medical emergency" means that condition which, on the basis of the
physician's good faith clinical judgment, so threatens the life of a pregnant
woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert her
death, or for which a delay will create serious risk of substantial and
irreversible impairment of major bodily function.
(3) (a)  "Partial birth abortion" means an abortion in which the person
performing the abortion:
(i)  deliberately and intentionally vaginally delivers a living fetus until,
in the case of a head first presentation, the entire fetal head is outside the
body of the mother, or, in the case of breech presentation, any part of the
fetal trunk past the navel is outside the body of the mother, for the purpose
of performing an overt act that the person knows will kill the partially
delivered living fetus; and
(ii)  performs the overt act, other than completion of delivery, that kills
the partially living fetus.
(b)  "Partial birth abortion" does not include the dilation and evacuation
procedure involving dismemberment prior to removal, the suction curettage
procedure, or the suction aspiration procedure for abortion.
(4)  "Physician" means:
(a)  a medical doctor licensed to practice medicine and surgery under Title
58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;
(b)  an osteopathic physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine under
Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; or
(c)  a physician employed by the federal government who has qualifications
similar to a person described in Subsection (4)(a) or (b).
(5)  "Hospital" means:
(a)  a general hospital licensed by the Department of Health according to
Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act; and
(b)  a clinic or other medical facility to the extent that such clinic or
other medical facility is certified by the Department of Health as providing
equipment and personnel sufficient in quantity and quality to provide the same
degree of safety to the pregnant woman and the unborn child as would be
provided for the particular medical procedures undertaken by a general
hospital licensed by the Department of Health.
